Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

Public Utilities

65-5-101. Power to fix rates of public utilities.

The Tennessee public utility commission has the power after hearing upon notice, by order in writing, to fix just and reasonable individual rates, joint rates, tolls, fares, charges or schedules thereof, as well as commutation, mileage, and other special rates which shall be imposed, observed, and followed thereafter by any public utility as defined in § 65-4-101, whenever the commission shall determine any existing individual rate, joint rate, toll, fare, charge, or schedule thereof or commutation, mileage, or other special rates to be unjust, unreasonable, excessive, insufficient, or unjustly discriminatory or preferential, howsoever the same may have heretofore been fixed or established. In fixing such rates, joint rates, tolls, fares, charges or schedules, or commutation, mileage or other special rates, the commission shall take into account the safety, adequacy and efficiency or lack thereof of the service or services furnished by the public utility.

Notwithstanding any other state law, special rates and terms negotiated between public utilities that are telecommunications providers and business customers shall not constitute price discrimination. Such rates and terms shall be presumed valid. The presumption of validity of such special rates and terms shall not be set aside except by complaint or by action of the Tennessee public utility commission commissioners, which Tennessee public utility commission action or complaint is supported by substantial evidence showing that such rates and terms violate applicable legal requirements other than the prohibition against price discrimination. Records of such special rates and terms shall be retained by the telecommunications provider for the length of time that such rates and terms apply, but shall not be filed with the commission. Such rates shall be effective upon execution by the parties.

Notwithstanding any other law, the tariffs of incumbent local exchange telephone companies establishing rates or terms, or both, for telecommunications services shall be filed with the commission and shall be effective twenty-one (21) days after filing, subject to the following requirements:

Tariffs establishing rates or terms that are valid only for one hundred eighty (180) days or less shall be effective one (1) business day after filing;

Tariffs may be revoked by the commission after notice and a hearing;

Tariffs may be suspended pending such hearing on a showing by a complaining party that:

The complaining party has filed a complaint before the commission alleging with particularity that the tariff violates a specific law;

The complaining party would be injured as a result of the tariff and has specifically alleged how it would be so injured; and

The complaining party has a substantial likelihood of prevailing on the merits of its complaint;

The commission may suspend a tariff pending a hearing, on its own motion, upon finding such suspension to be in the public interest. The standard established herein for suspension of tariffs shall apply at all times including the twenty-one (21) or one (1) day period between filing and effectiveness;

The standard established herein for suspension of tariffs shall not be applicable in any way to the determination by the commission of whether to convene a contested case to consider revocation of a tariff. The commission may choose to convene a contested case, or decline to convene a contested case, in its own discretion, to promote the public interest. The standard established in this subdivision (c)(3) for suspension of tariffs shall not be applicable in any way to any decision by the commission regarding revocation of a tariff;

Nothing in this subsection (c) shall alter the existing power of the commission to review those rate increases that are governed by price regulation or rate of return; and

Notwithstanding this subsection (c), the commission may, in its discretion, shorten the twenty-one (21) day period between filing and effectiveness for good cause shown.

In fixing rates, joint rates, tolls, fares, charges, or schedules for service, no privately owned public utility that supplies water to municipal governments is allowed to charge rates, joint rates, tolls, fares, charges, or schedules of any kind whatsoever in connection with fire hydrant service to a municipal government providing fire protection services within the service area. The utility, however, may recover its costs of providing fire hydrant service by charging rates, joint rates, tolls, fares, charges or schedules to its non-municipal government customers within the service area as approved by the Tennessee public utility commission. New rates shall take effect as prescribed by the Tennessee public utility commission in a rate proceeding. Such rate proceeding shall be initiated by the utility or the Tennessee public utility commission itself. Such rate proceeding shall be commenced within 120 days after May 18, 2004. The utility shall continue to collect its current authorized rates from a municipality until new rates are placed into effect by the Tennessee public utility commission. The municipal government will reimburse the state for any consequent increase in expenditures to the state, up to fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), which results directly from this subsection (d).

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3059a87; Code 1932, § 5450; Acts 1974, ch. 470, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-518; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 23; 2003, ch. 41, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-5-201; Acts 2004, ch. 545, § 1; 2004, ch. 716, § 1; 2005, ch. 173, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§ 65-5-101 — 65-5-115 (Acts 1897, ch. 10, §§ 8, 15-24, 34; 1907, ch. 390, § 2; Shan., §§ 3059a22, 3059a40-3059a45, 3059a47-3059a54, 3059a83; Code 1932, §§ 5397, 5416-5421, 5423-5430, 5446; Acts 1953, ch. 230, § 2 (Williams § 5470.4); impl. am. 1955, ch. 69, § 1; 1957, ch. 273, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-501 — 65-517; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 13; 1995, ch. 305, § 21), concerning regulation of freight carriers, was repealed by Acts 1997, ch. 39, § 1, effective April 2, 1997.

Acts 2004, ch. 716, § 2 provided that the provisions of this act shall not apply to utility districts heretofore or hereafter created under the “Utility District Act of 1937,” compiled in title 7, chapter 82.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, throughout the section, substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”, and substituted “The commission” for “The authority”, and “the commission” for “the authority”; and substituted “Tennessee public utility commission commissioners” for “Tennessee regulatory authority directors” in the second sentence of (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. County authority to establish rates for privately owned utility franchise, OAG 97-114, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 148 (8/14/97).

Constitutionality of discount utility rates for senior citizens. OAG 12-26, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 26 (2/29/12).

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 5; 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 5.

65-5-102. Commission may require filing of schedules.

The commission has the power to require every such public utility to file with it complete schedules of every classification employed and of every individual or joint rate, toll, fare, or charge made or exacted by it for any product supplied or service rendered within this state as specified in such requirement.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 4; Shan. Supp., § 3059a87; Code 1932, § 5450; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-519; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 23; T.C.A. § 65-5-202; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 52.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “The commission” for “The authority” at the beginning of the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 5.

65-5-103. Changes in utility rates, fares, schedules — Implementation of alternative regulatory methods to allow for public utility rate reviews and cost recovery in lieu of a general rate case proceeding.

When any public utility shall increase any existing individual rates, joint rates, tolls, fares, charges, or schedules thereof, or change or alter any existing classification, the commission shall have power either upon written complaint, or upon its own initiative, to hear and determine whether the increase, change or alteration is just and reasonable. The burden of proof to show that the increase, change, or alteration is just and reasonable shall be upon the public utility making the same. In determining whether such increase, change or alteration is just and reasonable, the commission shall take into account the safety, adequacy and efficiency or lack thereof of the service or services furnished by the public utility. The commission shall have authority pending such hearing and determination to order the suspension, not exceeding three (3) months from the date of the increase, change, or alteration until the commission shall have approved the increase, change, or alteration; provided, that if the investigation cannot be completed within three (3) months, the commission shall have authority to extend the period of suspension for such further period as will reasonably enable it to complete its investigation of any such increase, change or alteration; and provided further, that the commission shall give the investigation preference over other matters pending before it and shall decide the matter as speedily as possible, and in any event not later than nine (9) months after the filing of the increase, change or alteration. It shall be the duty of the commission to approve any such increase, change or alteration upon being satisfied after full hearing that the same is just and reasonable.

If the investigation has not been concluded and a final order made at the expiration of six (6) months from the date filed of any such increase, change or alteration, the utility may place the proposed increase, change or alteration, or any portion thereof, in effect at any time thereafter prior to the final commission decision thereon upon notifying the commission, in writing, of its intention so to do; provided, that the commission may require the utility to file with the commission a bond in an amount equal to the proposed annual increase conditioned upon making any refund ordered by the commission as provided in subdivision (b)(2).

Where increased rates or charges are thus made effective, the interested utility shall maintain its records in such a manner as will enable it, or the commission, to determine the amounts to be refunded and to whom due, in the event a refund is subsequently ordered by the commission as provided in this subdivision (b)(2). Upon completion of the hearing and decision, the commission may order the utility to refund, to the persons in whose behalf such amounts were paid, such portion of such increase, change or alteration as shall have been collected under bond and subsequently disallowed by the commission. If the commission, at any time during the initial three (3) months' suspension period, finds that an emergency exists or that the utility's credit or operations will be materially impaired or damaged by the failure to permit the rates to become effective during the three-month period, the commission may permit all or a portion of the increase, change or alteration to become effective under such terms and conditions as the commission may by order prescribe. Any increase, change or alteration placed in effect under this subsection (b) under bond may be continued in effect by the utility, pending final determination of the proceeding by final order of the commission or, if the matter be appealed, by final order of the appellate court. Should the final order of the commission be appealed while increased rates or charges are being collected under bond, the court shall have power to order an increase or decrease in the amount of the bond as the court may determine to be proper. In the event that all or any portion of such rates or charges have not been placed into effect under bond before the commission, the court considering an appeal from an order of the commission shall have the power to permit the utility to place all or any part of the rates or charges into effect under bond.

In the event the commission, by order, directs any utility to make a refund, as provided in subsection (b), of all or any portion of such increase, change or alteration, the utility shall make the same within ninety (90) days after a final determination of the proceeding by final order of the commission or, if the matter be appealed, by final order of the appellate court, with lawful interest thereon.

The commission is authorized to implement alternative regulatory methods to allow for public utility rate reviews and cost recovery in lieu of a general rate case proceeding before the commission.

For all alternative regulatory methods, the commission is authorized to develop minimum filing requirements and procedural schedules; provided, however, that a final determination of the commission pursuant to any alternative regulatory method be made by the commission no later than one hundred twenty (120) days from the initial filing by the public utility.

If the commission denies an alternative regulatory method filed by a public utility, the commission shall set forth with specificity the reasons for its denial and the public utility shall have the right to refile, without prejudice, an amended plan or amendment within sixty (60) days of the issuance of a final order. The commission shall thereafter have sixty (60) days to approve or deny the amended plan or amendment.

A public utility may request and the commission may authorize a mechanism to recover the operational expenses, capital costs or both, if such expenses or costs are found by the commission to be in the public interest, related to any one (1) of the following:

Safety requirements imposed by the state or federal government;

Ensuring the reliability of the public utility plant in service;

Replacement of or upgrades to usage measurement devices; or

Weather-related natural disasters.

The commission shall grant recovery and shall authorize a separate recovery mechanism or adjust rates to recover operational expenses, capital costs or both associated with the investment in such safety and reliability facilities, including the return on safety and reliability investments at the rate of return approved by the commission at the public utility's most recent general rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a), upon a finding that such mechanism or adjustment is in the public interest.

A public utility may request and the commission may authorize a mechanism to recover the operational expenses, capital costs or both related to the expansion of infrastructure for the purpose of economic development, if such expenses or costs are found by the commission to be in the public interest. Expansion of economic development infrastructure may include, but is not limited to, the following:

Infrastructure and equipment associated with alternative motor vehicle transportation fuel;

Infrastructure and equipment associated with combined heat and power installations in industrial or commercial sites; and

Infrastructure that will provide opportunities for economic development benefits in the area to be directly served by the infrastructure.

The commission shall grant recovery and shall authorize a separate recovery mechanism or adjust rates to recover operational expenses, capital costs or both associated with the investment in such economic development facilities, including the return on such economic development investments at the rate of return approved by the commission at the public utility's most recent general rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a), upon a finding that such mechanism or adjustment is in the public interest.

A public utility may request and the commission may authorize a mechanism to recover expenses associated with efforts to promote economic development in its service territory, if such expenses are found by the commission to be in the public interest.

Efforts to promote economic development may include, but are not limited to, foregone revenues associated with economic development riders and rates.

Expenses described in subdivision (d)(4)(A)(ii) may be reflected in cost of service and be subject to recovery through the annual review process in subdivision (d)(6).

Upon a finding that expenses to promote economic development have been incurred, the commission shall authorize a separate recovery mechanism or adjust rates to recover such expenses or grant recovery through the annual review process set forth in subdivision (d)(6), upon a finding that such mechanism or adjustment is in the public interest.

A public utility may request and the commission may authorize a mechanism to recover the operational expenses, capital costs or both related to other programs that are in the public interest.

A utility may request and the commission may authorize a mechanism to allow for and permit a more timely adjustment of rates resulting from changes in essential, nondiscretionary expenses, such as fuel and power and chemical expenses.

Upon a finding that such programs are in the public interest, the commission shall grant recovery and shall authorize a separate recovery mechanism or adjust rates to recover operational expenses, capital costs or both associated with the investment in other programs, including the rate of return approved by the commission at the public utility's most recent general rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a).

A public utility may opt to file for an annual review of its rates based upon the methodology adopted in its most recent rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a), if applicable.

In order for a public utility to be eligible to make an election to opt into an annual rate review, the public utility must have engaged in a general rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a) within the last five (5) years; provided, however, that the commission may waive such requirement or increase the eligibility period upon a finding that doing such would be in the public interest.

Pursuant to the procedures set forth in subdivision (d)(1), the commission shall review the annual filing by the public utility within one hundred twenty (120) days of receipt and order the public utility to make the adjustments to its tariff rates to provide that the public utility earns the authorized return on equity established in the public utility's most recent general rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a).

A public utility may terminate an approved annual review plan only by filing a general rate case pursuant to § 65-5-101 and subsection (a).

The commission may terminate an approved annual review plan only after citing the public utility to appear and show cause why the commission should not take such action pursuant to the procedures in § 65-2-106.

The commission or the public utility may propose a modification to the approved annual review plan for consideration by the commission. The commission shall determine whether any proposed modification is in the public interest and should be approved within the time frame set forth in subdivision (d)(6)(C). If the commission denies a modification to the approved annual review plan, the commission shall set forth with specificity the reasons for its denial.

In addition to the alternative regulatory methods described in this subsection (d), a public utility may opt to file for other alternative regulatory methods. Upon a filing by a public utility for an alternative method not prescribed, the commission is empowered to adopt policies or procedures, that would permit a more timely review and revisions of the rates, tolls, fares, charges, schedules, classifications or rate structures of public utilities, and that would further streamline the regulatory process and reduce the cost and time associated with the ratemaking processes in § 65-5-101 and subsection (a).

For purposes of this section, “public utility” does not include a telecommunications carrier that elects market regulation pursuant to § 65-5-109.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 5; Shan. Supp. § 3059a88; Code 1932, § 5451; Acts 1973, ch. 59, § 1; 1974, ch. 470, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-520; Acts 1983, ch. 347, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 23; T.C.A. § 65-5-203; Acts 2013, ch. 245, § 5; 2017, ch. 94, § 52; 2019, ch. 95, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “the commission” for “the authority” and “The commission” for “The authority” throughout the section.

The 2019 amendment added present (d)(2)(A)(iii) and resdesignated former (d)(2)(A)(iii) as present (d)(2)(A)(iv).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Acts 2019, ch. 95, § 2. March 28, 2019.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 21 Tenn. Juris., Public Service Commissions, § 5.

65-5-104. Unjust rate, fare, schedule or classification prohibited.

No public utility shall:

Make, impose, or exact any unreasonable, unjustly discriminatory or unduly preferential individual or joint rate, or special rate, toll, fare, charge, or schedule for any product, or service supplied or rendered by it within this state; or

Adopt or impose any unjust or unreasonable classification in the making or as the basis of any rate, toll, charge, fare, or schedule for any product or service rendered by it within this state.

Any measure taken by any public utility to avoid discrimination in rates, charges, fees and in the availability and quality of energy against consumers using solar- or wind-powered equipment as a source of energy shall not be considered unreasonable, unjust, or unduly preferential in violation of this section, unless such customers do not have sufficient safety equipment to protect the suppliers from damage.

Acts 1919, ch. 49, § 6; Shan. Supp., § 3059a89; Code 1932, § 5452; Acts 1980, ch. 756, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-521; Acts 1995, ch. 305, § 23; T.C.A. § 65-5-204.

Cross-References. Discrimination against consumers using solar- or wind-powered equipment prohibited, § 65-4-105.

Municipal public works, discrimination against consumers using auxiliary energy sources, § 7-34-114.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

65-5-105. Intrastate rate reductions reflecting tax savings.

Any public utility, the maximum rates of which are fixed by the commission, shall reduce its intrastate rates to reflect any tax savings resulting from Acts 1989, ch. 312. Such rate reduction shall be implemented contemporaneously with the effective date of the tax savings.

Acts 1989, ch. 312, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 23; T.C.A. § 65-5-205; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. For codification of Acts 1989, ch. 312, see the Session Law Disposition Table in Volume 13.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-5-106. Operator-assisted telephone services — Carriers whose rates exceed maximum approved rates.

Any telephone carrier offering or providing operator-assisted services in Tennessee whose intrastate rates exceed the maximum rate approved by the Tennessee public utility commission or whose interstate rates exceed the maximum rates approved by the federal communications commission (FCC) shall before providing the service:

Identify by name the carrier providing the service;

State all costs for providing the service; and

Offer to switch the customer to any other carrier offering operator-assisted services and inform the customer that the switch will be made without charge.

As used in this section:

“Maximum rate approved by the federal communications commission (FCC)” means the highest legal rate charged for handling an identical call by a carrier which has been classified by the FCC as a dominant, interstate carrier or, if no carrier has been so classified, means the highest rate approved by the FCC as just and reasonable for an identical call;

“Maximum rate approved by the Tennessee public utility commission” means the highest legal rate charged for handling an identical call by a carrier whose rates have been fixed by the commission based on the carrier's cost of providing service; and

“Operator-assisted services” means all telephone calls in which the customer is assisted by either a human or mechanical operator and includes, but is not limited to, calls billed to credit cards or third parties and all collect or person-to-person calls.

The commission may exempt any carrier from some or all of the provisions of this section upon a finding that the requirements are no longer necessary to protect the public interest.

Any telephone carrier violating this section is guilty of violating the Tennessee Consumer Protection Act of 1977, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 1, and shall be punished accordingly.

Acts 1990, ch. 675, § 1; 1995, ch. 305, § 23; T.C.A. § 65-5-206; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 675, § 3 provided that this section apply only to telephone calls which originate in Tennessee and which are billed to an address located within Tennessee.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority” in (a) and (b)(2); and substituted “commission” for “authority” in (b)(2) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. A long-distance telephone service reseller may charge a fee of eighty-five cents each time that it provides intrastate long distance directory assistance to Tennessee customers, OAG 00-133, 2000 Tenn. AG LEXIS 134 (8/18/00).

65-5-107. Universal service — Funding.

In order to ensure the availability of affordable residential basic local exchange telephone service, the commission shall formulate policies, promulgate rules and issue orders which require all telecommunications service providers to contribute to the support of universal service.

The commission shall create an alternative universal service support mechanism that replaces current sources of universal service support only if it determines that the alternative will preserve universal service, protect consumer welfare, be fair to all telecommunications service providers, and prevent the unwarranted subsidization of any telecommunications service provider's rates by consumers or by another telecommunications service provider. To accomplish these objectives, the commission, if it creates or subsequently modifies an alternative universal service support mechanism, shall:

Restrict recovery from the mechanism by any telecommunications service provider to an amount equal to the support necessary to provide universal service;

Consider provision of universal service by incumbent local exchange telephone companies and by other telecommunications service providers;

Order only such contributions to the universal service support mechanism as are necessary to support universal service and fund administration of the mechanism;

Administer the universal service support mechanism in a competitively neutral manner, and in accordance with established commission rules and federal statutes;

Determine the financial effect on each universal service provider caused by the creation or a modification of the universal service support mechanism, and rebalance the effect through a one-time adjustment of equal amount to the rates of that provider;

When ordering a modification, include changes in the cost of providing universal service in the rebalancing required by subdivision (b)(5);

When performing its duties under subdivisions (b)(5) and (6), order no increase in the rates for any interconnection services; and

Consider, at a minimum:

The amount by which the embedded cost of providing residential basic local exchange telephone service exceeds the revenue received from the service, including the cost of the carrier-of-last-resort obligation, for both high- and low-density service areas;

The extent to which rates for residential basic local exchange telephone service should be required to meet the standards of § 65-5-108(c); and

Intrastate access rates and the appropriateness of such rates as a significant source of universal service support.

The commission shall monitor the continued functioning of universal service mechanisms and shall conduct investigations, issue show cause orders, entertain petitions or complaints, or adopt rules in order to assure that the universal service mechanism is modified and enforced in accordance with the criteria set forth in this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the commission to raise residential basic local exchange telephone service rates.

Any universal service support mechanism created pursuant to this part shall hereafter be known as the universal service program. To implement any such universal service program, there is established a special reserve account in the state's general fund to be funded and allocated in accordance with this section and rules promulgated by the commission. Such fund shall be known as the universal service program support mechanism fund. Moneys from the fund may be expended in accordance with such universal service program. Any moneys deposited in the fund shall remain in such account until expended for purposes consistent with such program and shall not revert to the general fund on any June 30. Any interest earned by deposits in such account shall not revert to the general fund on any June 30 but shall remain in such account until expended for purposes consistent with the universal service program.

Acts 1995, ch. 408, § 4; 2001, ch. 124, § 1; T.C.A. § 65-5-207; Acts 2013, ch. 61, § 1; 2017, ch. 94, § 52.

Code Commission Notes.

Former subsection (b), concerning the initiation of a generic contested case proceeding within thirty (30) days of June 6, 1995, was deemed obsolete by the Code Commission in 2004.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305 § 23, which substituted “authority” for “commission” throughout this chapter, is deemed to amend this section, effective July 1, 1996.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout the section.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority's right to retain interest from universal service fund, OAG 98-0177, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 177 (8/28/98).

65-5-108. Classification of services — Exempt services — Price floor — Maximum rates for non-basic services.

Services of incumbent local exchange telephone companies who apply for price regulation under § 65-5-109 are classified as follows:

“Basic local exchange telephone services” are telecommunications services which are comprised of an access line, dial tone, touch-tone and usage provided to the premises for the provision of two-way switched voice or data transmission over voice grade facilities of residential customers or business customers within a local calling area, Lifeline, Link-Up Tennessee, 911 Emergency Services and educational discounts existing on June 6, 1995, or other services required by state or federal statute. These services shall, at a minimum, be provided at the same level of quality as is being provided on June 6, 1995. Rates for these services shall include both recurring and nonrecurring charges.

“Non-basic services” are telecommunications services which are not defined as basic local exchange telephone services and are not exempted under subsection (b). Rates for these services shall include both recurring and nonrecurring charges.

The commission, after notice and opportunity for hearing, may find that the public interest and the policies set forth in this part are served by exempting a service or group of services from all or a portion of the requirements of this part. Upon making such a finding, the commission may exempt telecommunications service providers from such requirements as appropriate. The commission shall in any event exempt a telecommunications service for which existing and potential competition is an effective regulator of the price of those services.

Effective January 1, 1996, an incumbent local exchange telephone company shall adhere to a price floor for its competitive services subject to such determination as the commission shall make pursuant to § 65-5-107. The price floor shall equal the incumbent local exchange telephone company's tariffed rates for essential elements utilized by competing telecommunications service providers plus the total long-run incremental cost of the competitive elements of the service. When shown to be in the public interest, the commission shall exempt a service or group of services provided by an incumbent local exchange telephone company from the requirement of the price floor. The commission shall, as appropriate, also adopt other rules or issue orders to prohibit cross-subsidization, preferences to competitive services or affiliated entities, predatory pricing, price squeezing, price discrimination, tying arrangements or other anti-competitive practices.

The maximum rate for any new non-basic service first offered after June 6, 1995, shall not exceed the stand-alone cost of the service.

Acts 1995, ch. 408, § 9; T.C.A. § 65-5-208; Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1995, ch. 305 § 23, which substituted “authority” for “commission” throughout this chapter, is deemed to amend this section, effective July 1, 1996.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “commission” for “authority” throughout (b) and (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.